Alabama, session 2026rs, SB323.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Sections 15-16-43, 15-16-61, and 15-16-70,
Code of Alabama 1975, are amended to read as follows:
"§15-16-43
(a)(1) If, at the final hearing, the court finds that
the defendant has a mental illness and as a consequence of the
mental illness poses a real and present threat of substantial
harm to himself, or herself, or to others, the court shall
order the defendant committed to the custody of the
Commissioner of the Alabama State Department of Mental Health
Commissioner or to another public facility as the court may
order.
(2) If the court does not make a finding that the
defendant has a mental illness and as a consequence of the
mental illness poses a real and present threat of substantial
harm to himself, or herself, or to others, then the defendant
shall be released from custody.
(b) In determining whether the defendant poses a real
and present threat of substantial harm to himself, or herself,
or to others, the court shall consider all available relevant
information, including any known relevant aspects of the
defendant's psychosocial, medical, and psychiatric history, in
Page 2

defendant's psychosocial, medical, and psychiatric history, in
SB323 INTRODUCED
addition to the defendant's current behavior.
(c) The Department of Mental Health or the defendant
may appeal to the Court of Criminal Appeals the following
orders:
(1) Orders entered pursuant to subsection (a).
(2) Orders denying a petition for release concerning
that defendant."
"§15-16-61
The following definitions shall apply to this
articleFor the purposes of this article, the following terms
have the following meanings:
(1) COURT. The court whichthat committed the defendant
pursuant to Section 15-16-43.
(2) DEFENDANT. A defendant in a criminal case who has
been found not guilty by reason of insanity, or not guilty by
reason of mental disease or defect, and has been committed to
the custody of the Alabama State Department of Mental Health
and Mental Retardation or another facility as provided
bypursuant to Section 15-16-43.
(3) DEPARTMENT. The State Department of Mental Health
and Mental Retardation.
(4) DISTRICT ATTORNEY. The district attorney for the
judicial circuit of the court whichthat committed the
defendant pursuant to Section 15-16-43.
(5) REGIONAL OR COMMUNITY MENTAL HEALTH FACILITY. Any
mental health facility providing mental health services
pursuant to Sections 22-51-1 through 22-51-14Chapter 51 of
Title 22."
Page 3

Title 22."
SB323 INTRODUCED
"§15-16-70
(a)(1) If at any time it appears to the court that the
defendant has failed to comply with the conditions of release,
that the defendant's condition has deteriorated to the point
that inpatient care is required, or that the release
conditions should be modified, the court may, after a hearing,
may either:
a. modifyModify the release conditions; or
b. orderOrder the defendant returned to the Department
of Mental Health and Mental Retardationdepartment for further
treatment.
(2) All such hearings held pursuant to this section
shall be preceded by notice to the department and to the
parties required to be notified inpursuant to Section
15-16-63.
100 (3) All such modifications and orders shall be guided
101 by the standard of whether suchthe modifications and orders
102 are necessary to ensure that the defendant does not pose a
103 real and present threat of substantial harm to himself,
104 herself, or to others.
105 (b) The department or the defendant may appeal to the
106 Court of Criminal Appeals the following orders:
107 (1) Orders entered pursuant to subsection (a).
108 (2) Orders otherwise denying the release of a defendant
109 adjudicated not guilty by reason of insanity or by reason of
110 mental disease or defect pursuant to this article."
111 Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
112 1, 2026.
Page 4